District of Columbia statutes.
38-2910

Procedure for adjusting appropriation in case of revenue unavailability.

If in any given fiscal year the Council finds that full funding of the Formula from local revenues is inconsistent with legal requirements for a balanced budget, the following shall apply:

(1)

The Council shall reduce the foundation level accordingly, and set a schedule for achieving or restoring full funding, however, funding shall not be less than 95% of the previous fiscal year’s funding; and

(2)

The Mayor, Council, Superintendent/CEO, and Board of Education shall use their best efforts to obtain temporary supplemental funding from other revenue sources.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-207, § 111, 45 DCR 8095
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 4002(h), 53 DCR 6899
This section is referenced in § 38-2903.
1981 Ed., § 31-2910.
D.C. Law 16-192 rewrote par. (2) which had read as follows: “(2) The Mayor, Council, Superintendent/CEO, Board of Education and the Emergency Transitional Education Board of Trustees shall use their best efforts to obtain temporary supplemental funding from other revenue sources.”
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 38-2901.
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 38-2901.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(h) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(h) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(h) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).